apertium-en-it.it.dix
<pardef n="acce/ndere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderemmo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderei</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndereste</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderesti</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>nderebber</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderebbero</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderebbe</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderemo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderò</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderete</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderai</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>nderan</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderanno</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nderà</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndendo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndendo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndemmo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>si</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndeste</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndesti</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ser</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sero</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndiamo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndete</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndi</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ndan</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndano</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nda</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>nder</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndere</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nder</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndevamo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndevo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndevate</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndevi</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ndevan</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndevano</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndeva</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndessimo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndessi</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndeste</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndessi</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ndesser</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndessero</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndesse</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sa</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>si</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>so</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndiamo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndete</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndi</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ndon</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndono</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nde</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndiamo</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nda</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndiate</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nda</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ndan</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ndano</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>nda</l>
	  <r>ndere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="accendere"><i>acce</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apprendere"><i>appre</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ascendere"><i>asce</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="comprendere"><i>compre</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="contendere"><i>conte</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difendere"><i>dife</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dipendere"><i>dipe</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="disattendere"><i>disatte</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="estendere"><i>este</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="offendere"><i>offe</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pendere"><i>pe</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prendere"><i>pre</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pretendere"><i>prete</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scendere"><i>sce</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sorprendere"><i>sorpre</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sospendere"><i>sospe</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stendere"><i>ste</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tendere"><i>te</i><par n="acce/ndere__vblex"/></e>
